Utah statutes.
77-27-5.3.   Meritless and bad faith litigation.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "Convicted" means a conviction by entry of a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere, guilty and mentally ill, no contest, and conviction of any crime
or offense.
(b)  "Prisoner" means a person who has been convicted of a crime and is
incarcerated for that crime or is being held in custody for trial or
sentencing.
(2)  In any case filed in state or federal court in which a prisoner submits a
claim that the court finds to be without merit and brought or asserted in bad
faith, the Board of Pardons and Parole and any county jail administrator may
consider that finding in any early release decisions concerning the prisoner.
